New York, session 2025-2026, A11398.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public buildings law is amended by adding a new section 2 5-d to read as follows: 3 § 5-d. Flag and plaque for raising awareness of veteran suicide in the 4 capitol. There shall be set aside space in the capitol by the commis- 5 sioner of general services for the display of the Veteran Suicide Aware- 6 ness and Remembrance flag and plaque, and such commissioner shall 7 provide for the placement and maintenance of such flag and plaque in the 8 capitol to raise awareness of veteran suicide. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15843-01-6